Wyoming, session 2026, HB0093.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 5-1-112 is created to read:

5-1-112. Court records and court recordings; free
online access required; exceptions; definitions.

(a) As used in this section:
HB0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0316

(i) "Court" means the Wyoming supreme court, the
district courts, chancery court, circuit courts, probate
courts and municipal courts of Wyoming and any other court
in Wyoming established by state law;

(ii) "Court record" means any record created by
or submitted to a court, including but not limited to:

(A) All pleadings, motions, filings, orders
and judgments;

(B) Evidence, exhibits and discovery
materials submitted to a court, including interrogatories,
depositions, affidavits and appendices;

(C) Case metadata, including docket
numbers, filing dates, case status and parties of record.

(iii) "Sensitive and bulky exhibits" means
money, controlled substances, child pornography, firearms,
oversized charts, enlarged pictures and any other physical
HB0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0316
evidence that cannot be reduced to online access with
reasonable effort and expense.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, each court shall make all of its court records
available for public viewing at no cost through an online
portal accessible through the court's website. For purposes
of this subsection:

(i) Each court may include a link on its website
to the website where public access is made available;

(ii) Groups of courts may utilize the same court
information technology system or file access system to
provide public online access to court records;

(iii) Public access shall be made available
through standard internet browsers without requiring
registration or the payment of fees or costs;

(iv) Nothing in this section shall be construed
to prohibit or limit a court from charging fees for:

HB0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0316
(A) Parties making electronic filings in
that court;

(B) Paper copies of court records.

(c) Courts may, by rule, exempt or limit online
public access to the following court records:

(i) Court records in proceedings in juvenile
court;

(ii) Court records in adoption, guardianship and
conservatorship proceedings;

(iii) Court records in cases and proceedings
involving minors, except for those cases and proceedings
where:

(A) The minor is charged with a criminal
offense as an adult;

(B) The case is transferred from juvenile
court to district court in accordance with W.S. 14-6-237.
HB0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0316
For court records in cases under this subparagraph, only
court records generated after a case is transferred to
district court shall be included in the public access
online system.

(iv) Sensitive and bulky records;

(v) Sexual assault offenses charged under title
6, chapter 2, article 3 of the Wyoming statutes, in
accordance with W.S. 6-2-319;

(vi) Court records in cases that are sealed by a
court, in accordance with all of the following:

(A) A court may seal a case upon motion by
a party and upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence
that:

(I) There exists an interest that will
suffer serious and likely harm from disclosure of the court
records;

HB0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0316
(II) The interest identified in
subdivision (I) of this subparagraph outweighs the public's
interest in access to the court records; and

(III) There is no less restrictive
alternative available to adequately protect the interest
identified in subdivision (I) of this subparagraph.

(B) Any sealing of court records made under
this paragraph shall be narrowly tailored;

(C) A court ordering the sealing of court
records under this paragraph shall provide particularized
findings on the record for the need for sealing and shall
specify the duration of the sealing and a mechanism for
periodically reviewing the order sealing the court records;

(D) The court shall give preference to
redaction, anonymization and delayed disclosure over
sealing court records;

(E) For cases or court records sealed under
this paragraph, the case number and a brief description of
HB0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0316
the reason for sealing or restricting the court records
shall be included on the website or online portal where
court records may be accessed in accordance with this
section.

(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this
section, each court shall:

(i) Provide live, real-time audio or video
streaming of each hearing or proceeding at no cost to the
public;

(ii) Provide audio or video recordings of each
hearing or proceeding on the court's website at no cost to
the public not later than seven (7) days after the hearing
or proceeding concludes;

(iii) Maintain an online archive of its audio
and video recordings searchable by case number, party and
date.

(e) Subsection (d) of this section shall not apply
to:
HB0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0316

(i) Courts that have not made audio or video
recordings of its hearings or proceedings at any time
before July 1, 2026;

(ii) Cases and proceedings identified in
paragraphs (c)(i), (ii), (iii), (v) and (vi) of this
section.

(f) In implementing this section, the supreme court
or the judicial conference of district judges, as
applicable, shall:

(i) Individually or collectively for groups of
courts, develop, maintain and operate an online portal or
access system to make court records and recordings
available to the public at no cost;

(ii) Establish technical standards for
uploading, indexing and securing court records;

(iii) Promulgate rules for the redaction of
confidential information in accordance with law.
HB0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0316

Section 2. W.S. 5-2-120(a) is amended to read:

5-2-120. Judicial systems automation account created;
purposes; court information technology equipment.

(a) There is created an account entitled the
"judicial systems automation account." No funds shall be
expended from the account unless and until the legislature
appropriates the funds. Funds within the account shall be
used by the supreme court for the purchase, maintenance and
operation of computer hardware, including court information
technology equipment, and software to enhance the
communication, records and management needs of the courts
of the judicial branch of the state of Wyoming. Funds
within the account may be used, as determined by the
supreme court, to provide online public access to court
records and recordings in accordance with W.S. 5-1-112.
Interest accruing to this account shall be retained therein
and shall be expended for the purposes provided in this
section, as appropriated by the legislature. Annually, the
supreme court shall develop a plan for all trial and
appellate courts within the state for the expenditure of
HB0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0316
funds from the account. Prior to implementation, the plan
shall be annually submitted to the joint appropriations
interim committee and joint judiciary interim committee for
review and comment.

Section 3. There is appropriated one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming
supreme court for purposes of implementing this act. The
supreme court shall oversee the distribution of funds from
this appropriation to other courts to ensure that each
court receives funds to comply with this act. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning July 1,
2026 and ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included on the supreme court's
standard budget request for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

Section 4. The supreme court and any other court may
take any action necessary to implement this act.
HB0093

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0316

Section 5.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0093